Utah statutes.
10-6-129.   Emergency expenditures.
(1)  If the governing body of a city determines that an emergency exists, such
as widespread damage from fire, flood, or earthquake, and that the emergency
necessitates the expenditure of money in excess of the budget of the general
fund, the governing body may by resolution amend the budget and authorize such
expenditures and incur such deficits in the fund balance of the general fund
as may be reasonably necessary to meet the emergency.
(2)  Except to the extent provided for in Title 53, Chapter 2, Part 4,
Disaster Recovery Funding Act, the governing body of a city may not expend
monies in the city's local fund for an emergency, if the city creates a local
fund under Title 53, Chapter 2, Part 4, Disaster Recovery Funding Act.
